src/morphology/stems/nob-abbreviations.lexc
! ================================================== !
! File containing abbreviations for Norwegian Bokmål !
! ================================================== !

! Lexica for adding tags and periods
! ----------------------------------

! Splitting in 3 groups, because of the preprocessor
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON Abbreviation-nob
ITRAB ;
TRNUMAB ;
TRAB ;
NOAB ;

! =============================================== !
!            Intransitive abbreviations           !
! =============================================== !

! These give clause boundaries before capital letters
! and numbers, but not elsewhere.
! Vi bor i Sth. CLB 10 av oss er innflyttere.
! Vi bor i Sth. CLB Saara er også innflytter.
! Vi vet at Sth. er en fin by.


LEXICON NOAB
! This class contains homonyms, which are both intransitive 
! abbreviations and normal words. The abbreviation usage
! is less common and thus only the occurences in the middle of
! the sentnece can be considered as true cases.

du ab-dot ; !dualis
gen ab-dot ; ! genitiivi
jur ab-dot ; !juridihkalaš !
min ab-dot ; !
